Hawaii statutes.
§130-5 Applicability. This chapter
shall control and be supreme in the event it shall be employed notwithstanding
any statutory, charter, or ordinance provision to the contrary or in conflict
herewith. [L 1959, c 16, §5; Supp, §359A-5; HRS §130-5]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next